Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.20.005

General prohibition on deposit taking.

Except as authorized by this chapter or other governing law, a trust company may not take or hold deposits of funds in this state unless:

(1) It is authorized to do business in this state as a depository institution; and

(2) Complies with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations respecting the taking and handling of monetary deposits.

[ 2014 c 37 s 360.]